Illinois, session 104th, HB753.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Accountable Care Organization Clinical 5Laboratory Testing Advisory Board Act is amended by changing 6Section 1 as follows: 7    (210 ILCS 26/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Accountable Care Organization Clinical Laboratory Testing 10Advisory Board Act.11(Source: P.A. 98-708, eff. 1-1-15.)